Mississippi, session 2026, HB1635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-31-104, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Through June 30, * * *2026 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 27-31-104. (1)  (a)  County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities are each hereby authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement with an enterprise granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, including ad valorem taxes levied for school purposes, for the following: (i) Projects totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by any new enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; (ii) Projects by a private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) having a minimum capital investment of Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00); (iii) Projects by a qualified business (as such term is defined in Section 57-117-3) meeting minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority; (iv) Projects, in addition to those projects referenced in Section 27-31-105, totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by an existing enterprise that has been doing business in the county or municipality for twenty-four (24) months.  For purposes of this subparagraph (iv), the term "existing enterprise" includes those enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; or (v) A private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) or entity defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) having a minimum capital investment of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) from any source or combination of sources, provided that a majority of the capital investment is from private sources, when such project is located within a geographic area for which a Presidential Disaster Declaration was issued on or after January 1, 2014. County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may not enter into an agreement with an enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment, as defined in Section 41-137-3 of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes. (b) A fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted in accordance with this section may include any or all tangible property, real or personal, including any leasehold interests therein but excluding automobiles and trucks operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of any enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, private company or business, as applicable, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes.  If a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes is granted pursuant to this section with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt and subject to the fee-in-lieu granted in accordance herewith without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor. (2) A county board of supervisors may enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the county and any county school district, and a municipality may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the municipality and any municipal school district located in the municipality; however, if the project is located outside the limits of a municipality but within the boundaries of the municipal school district, then the county board of supervisors may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the school district granting a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes for school district purposes. (3) Any grant of a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes shall be evidenced by a written agreement negotiated by the enterprise and the county board of supervisors and/or municipal authority, as the case may be, and given final approval by the Mississippi Development Authority as satisfying the requirements of this section. (4) (a)  The minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu shall not be less than one-third (1/3), or one-tenth (1/10) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, of the ad valorem levy, including ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and except as otherwise provided, the sum allowed shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, however, except as otherwise provided in this section, from the sum allowed the apportionment to school districts shall not be less than the school districts' pro rata share based upon the proportion that the millage imposed for the school districts by the appropriate levying authority bears to the millage imposed by such levying authority for all other county or municipal purposes.  Any fee-in-lieu agreement entered into under this section shall become a binding obligation of the parties to the agreement, be effective upon its execution by the parties and approval by the Mississippi Development Authority and, except as otherwise provided in Section 17-25-23 or Section 57-75-33, or any other provision of law, continue in effect for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years commencing on the date that the fee-in-lieu granted thereunder begins in accordance with the agreement; however, no particular parcel of land, real property improvement or item of personal property shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu for a duration of more than ten (10) years.  Any such agreement shall be binding, according to its terms, on future boards of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of a municipality, as the case may be, for the duration of the agreement. (b) For any project with a capital investment in excess of One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) for which a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into after July 1, 2026, or for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu on the portion of the project in excess of One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00): (i) twenty percent (20%) shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and (ii) eighty percent (80%) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Strategic Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act. (5) The fee-in-lieu may be a stated fraction or percentage of the ad valorem taxes otherwise payable or a stated dollar amount.  If the fee is a fraction or percentage of the ad valorem tax levy, it shall be annually computed on all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable, including school taxes, as the same may vary from year to year based upon changes in the millage rate or assessed value and shall not be less than one-third (1/3) of that amount or one-tenth (1/10) of that amount if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026.  If the fee is a stated dollar amount, said amount shall be the higher of the sum provided for fixed payment or (a) one-third (1/3) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu or (b) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, one-tenth (1/10) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu. (6) Notwithstanding Section 27-31-111, the parties to a fee-in-lieu may agree on terms and conditions providing for the reduction, suspension, termination or reinstatement of a fee-in-lieu agreement or any fee-in-lieu period granted thereunder upon the cessation of operations by project for twelve (12) or more consecutive months or due to other conditions set forth in the agreement. (7) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) and located in a county that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under Section 57-64-1 et seq., the members of the regional economic development alliance may divide the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu in a manner as determined by the alliance agreement, and the boards of supervisors of the member counties may then apportion the sum allowed between school district purposes and all other county purposes. (8) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), the board of supervisors of the county in which the project is located may negotiate with the school district in which the project is located and apportion to the school district an amount of the fee-in-lieu that is agreed upon in the negotiations different than the amount provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (9) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), the annual amount of the fee-in-lieu apportioned to the county shall not be less than the amount necessary to pay the debt service on bonds issued by the county pursuant to Section 57-75-37(3)(c). (10) For any county and/or municipality that enters into a fee-in-lieu agreement for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), the minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu for the project shall not be less than one-third (1/3); provided that such allowed sum of each annual fee-in-lieu payment may be first apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in any such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, to either: (a) first allocate and remit to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment to repay to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, funds advanced thereby to such county and/or municipality or to other public agency, as defined in Section 57-75-37(7)(a)(ii), to fund public improvements and related costs for the project pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(c)(iii); or (b) first allocate and remit to the enterprise owning and/or operating the project such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment payable thereto pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(d)(iv).  The balance of any annual fee-in-lieu amount remaining after such initial allocation and remittance to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, Mississippi Development Authority or enterprise owning and/or operating the project, as applicable, shall then be apportioned in accordance with subsection (4) of this section or as otherwise authorized by state law. (11) Any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted under this section before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. [From and after July 1, * * *2026 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 27-31-104. (1)  (a)  County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities are each hereby authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement with an enterprise granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, including ad valorem taxes levied for school purposes, for the following: (i) Projects totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by any new enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; (ii) Projects by a private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5, Mississippi Code of 1972) having a minimum capital investment of Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00); (iii) Projects, in addition to those projects referenced in Section 27-31-105, totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by an existing enterprise that has been doing business in the county or municipality for twenty-four (24) months. For purposes of this subparagraph (iii), the term "existing enterprise" includes those enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; or (iv) A private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) or entity defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) having a minimum capital investment of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) from any source or combination of sources, provided that a majority of the capital investment is from private sources, when such project is located within a geographic area for which a Presidential Disaster Declaration was issued on or after January 1, 2014. County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may not enter into an agreement with an enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment, as defined in Section 41-137-3 of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes. (b) A fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted in accordance with this section may include any or all tangible property, real or personal, including any leasehold interests therein but excluding automobiles and trucks operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of any enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, private company or business, as applicable, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes.  If a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes is granted pursuant to this section with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt and subject to the fee-in-lieu granted in accordance herewith without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor. (2) A county board of supervisors may enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the county and any county school district, and a municipality may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the municipality and any municipal school district located in the municipality; however, if the project is located outside the limits of a municipality but within the boundaries of the municipal school district, then the county board of supervisors may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the school district granting a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes for school district purposes. (3) Any grant of a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes shall be evidenced by a written agreement negotiated by the enterprise and the county board of supervisors and/or municipal authority, as the case may be, and given final approval by the Mississippi Development Authority as satisfying the requirements of this section. (4) (a)  The minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu shall not be less than one-third (1/3), or one-tenth (1/10) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, of the ad valorem levy, including ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and except as otherwise provided, the sum allowed shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, however, except as otherwise provided in this section, from the sum allowed the apportionment to school districts shall not be less than the school districts' pro rata share based upon the proportion that the millage imposed for the school districts by the appropriate levying authority bears to the millage imposed by such levying authority for all other county or municipal purposes. Any fee-in-lieu agreement entered into under this section shall become a binding obligation of the parties to the agreement, be effective upon its execution by the parties and approval by the Mississippi Development Authority and, except as otherwise provided in Section 17-25-23 or Section 57-75-33, or any other provision of law, continue in effect for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years commencing on the date that the fee-in-lieu granted thereunder begins in accordance with the agreement; however, no particular parcel of land, real property improvement or item of personal property shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu for a duration of more than ten (10) years.  Any such agreement shall be binding, according to its terms, on future boards of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of a municipality, as the case may be, for the duration of the agreement. (b) For any project with a capital investment in excess of One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) for which a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into after July 1, 2026, or for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu on the portion of the project in excess of One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00): (i) twenty percent (20%) shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and (ii) eighty percent (80%) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Strategic Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act. (5) The fee-in-lieu may be a stated fraction or percentage of the ad valorem taxes otherwise payable or a stated dollar amount.  If the fee is a fraction or percentage of the ad valorem tax levy, it shall be annually computed on all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable, including school taxes, as the same may vary from year to year based upon changes in the millage rate or assessed value and shall not be less than one-third (1/3) of that amount or one-tenth (1/10) of that amount if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026.  If the fee is a stated dollar amount, said amount shall be the higher of the sum provided for fixed payment or (a) one-third (1/3) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu or (b) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, one-tenth (1/10) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu. (6) Notwithstanding Section 27-31-111, the parties to a fee-in-lieu may agree on terms and conditions providing for the reduction, suspension, termination or reinstatement of a fee-in-lieu agreement or any fee-in-lieu period granted thereunder upon the cessation of operations by project for twelve (12) or more consecutive months or due to other conditions set forth in the agreement. (7) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) and located in a county that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under Section 57-64-1 et seq., the members of the regional economic development alliance may divide the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu in a manner as determined by the alliance agreement, and the boards of supervisors of the member counties may then apportion the sum allowed between school district purposes and all other county purposes. (8) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), the board of supervisors of the county in which the project is located may negotiate with the school district in which the project is located and apportion to the school district an amount of the fee-in-lieu that is agreed upon in the negotiations different than the amount provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (9) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), the annual amount of the fee-in-lieu apportioned to the county shall not be less than the amount necessary to pay the annual debt service on bonds issued by the county pursuant to Section 57-75-37(3)(c). (10) For any county and/or municipality that enters into a fee-in-lieu agreement for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), the minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu for the project shall not be less than one-third (1/3); provided that such allowed sum of each annual fee-in-lieu payment may be first apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in any such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, to either: (a) first allocate and remit to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment to repay to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, funds advanced thereby to such county and/or municipality or to other public agency, as defined in Section 57-75-37(7)(a)(ii), to fund public improvements and related costs for the project pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(c)(iii); or (b) first allocate and remit to the enterprise owning and/or operating the project such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment payable thereto pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(d)(iv).  The balance of any annual fee-in-lieu amount remaining after such initial allocation and remittance to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, Mississippi Development Authority or enterprise owning and/or operating the project, as applicable, shall then be apportioned in accordance with subsection (4) of this section or as otherwise authorized by state law. (11) Any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted under this section before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. SECTION 2.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Strategic Development Fund", which shall consist of funds deposited therein under Section 27-31-104, Mississippi Code of 1972, and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Mississippi Development Authority, upon appropriation by the Legislature, making strategic infrastructure investments, furthering economic development and making quality of life improvements statewide. SECTION 3.  Section 27-31-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-31-105. (1)  Any person, firm or corporation who owns or operates a manufacturing or other enterprise of public utility as enumerated in Section 27-31-101 and who makes additions to or expansions of the facilities or properties or replaces equipment used in connection with or necessary to the operation of such enterprise may be granted an exemption from ad valorem taxation, except state ad valorem taxation, ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and ad valorem taxes on the products thereof or on automobiles and trucks belonging thereto and operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, upon each addition to or expansion of the facility or property or replacement of equipment, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise enumerated in Section 27-31-101, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes, within the discretion of the county board of supervisors and municipal authorities; however, such governing authorities shall not exempt ad valorem taxes for school district purposes on such additions or expansions of the facility or property, or replacement of equipment.  If an exemption is granted pursuant to this subsection (1) with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise enumerated in Section 27-31-101, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor.  In order to obtain the exemptions authorized by this section, a person, firm or corporation shall follow the same procedure prescribed for obtaining an exemption on a new enterprise, except as otherwise provided in this section.  For any additions, expansions or replacements with reference to any particular new enterprise, which have been completed during any calendar year, only one (1) request must be made for the exemptions sought for the additions, expansions or replacements.  The time of the exemption shall commence from the date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements, and shall extend for a period not to exceed ten (10) years thereafter; however, boards of supervisors and municipal authorities, in lieu of granting the exemption for one (1) period of ten (10) years, may grant the exemption in consecutive periods of five (5) years each, but the total of such consecutive periods shall not exceed ten (10) years.  The initial request for an exemption must be made in writing by June 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the additions, expansions or replacements are completed.  If the initial request for the exemption is not timely made, the board of supervisors or municipal authorities may grant a subsequent request for the exemption and, in such case, the exemption shall begin on the anniversary date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements in the year in which the request is made and may be for a period of time extending not more than ten (10) years from the date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements.  Any subsequent request for the exemption must be made in writing by June 1 of the year in which it is granted.  Any exemption from ad valorem taxes granted under this subsection (1) before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. (2) For expansions of facilities or properties, or replacement of equipment, county boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may grant a fee in lieu of taxes in the same manner, to the same extent, and with the same qualifying threshold as provided for projects under Section 27-31-104, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Any fee-in-lieu of taxes granted under this subsection (2) before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.